Utah statutes.
40-1-11.   Interfering with notices, stakes, or monuments -- Penalty.

Any person who intentionally or knowingly tears down or defaces a notice posted on a mining claim, or takes up or destroys any stake or monument marking the claim, or interferes with any person lawfully in possession of the claim, or who alters, erases, defaces, or destroys any record kept by a mining district or county recorder, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $25 nor more than $100, or by imprisonment for not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

